Hawaii statutes.
§88-111 Custodian of the funds. The
State director of finance shall be the custodian of the several funds. All
payment from the funds shall be made by the director of finance only upon
vouchers signed by the chairperson and countersigned by such other person as
may be designated by the board of trustees. [L 1925, c 55, pt of §7; RL 1935,
pt of §7926; RL 1945, pt of §711; RL 1955, §6-73; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §14; am
L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS §88-101; am L 1969, c 110, pt of §1; gen ch 1985, 1993]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next